Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
2023 LEGISLATION FOLLOW-UP
NOTE: Section 1 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 2.  Section 17, chapter 579, Oregon Laws 2019, as  amended by section 13, chapter 490,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 4, chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 17.  (1) ORS 315.591 to 315.603 apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2020,
and before January 1, 2030.
(2) Except as provided in ORS 315.593 (6), a credit may not be  claimed under ORS 315.593 for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2030.
(3) The amendments to ORS 315.591, 315.593 and 315.595 by sections 1 to 3 , chapter 545,
Oregon Laws 2023, [ of this 2023 Act ] apply to tax years  beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and
before January 1, [ 2026] 2030.
SECTION 3.  Section 1, chapter 423, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)(a) Outstanding ad valorem property taxes, and  interest on the taxes, assessed on real
property[ , the ownership of which was transferred, from the federal government to a  port district
formed under ORS chapter 777, ] described in paragraph (b) of this subsection  by the assessor of
the county in which the real property is located, are hereby canceled.
(b) This subsection applies to property in which the federal  government held a leasehold
interest, from a port district formed under ORS chapter 777, that was terminated.
(2) Ad valorem property taxes, and interest on the taxes, assessed on real property owned by a
port without  a working waterfront formed under ORS chapter 777, that have been outstanding since
a date prior to January 1, 2012, are  hereby canceled, provided the tax collector of the county in
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 1
which the  property is located has exhausted all remedies provided by law for collection of the taxes
and interest.
SECTION 4.  Section 2, chapter 423, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Section 1 , chapter 423, Oregon Laws 2023,  [ of this 2023 Act ] is repealed  on January
2, [2025] 2026.
SECTION 5.  Section 16, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 16.  (1) The amendments to ORS 284.368  by section 1 , chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of
this 2022 Act ] apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
(2) The amendments to sections 3 and 5, chapter 589,  Oregon Laws 2021, by sections 3 and 4 ,
chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of this 2022 Act ] apply to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2022, and before January 1, [ 2024] 2026, and to estimated payments due on and after June 15, 2022.
(3) The amendments to section 2, chapter  527, Oregon Laws 2021, by section 8 , chapter 82,
Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of this 2022 Act ] apply to applications for precertification under section 4,
chapter 527, Oregon Laws 2021, and applications for  exemption under section 5, chapter 527, Oregon
Laws 2021, without precertification, filed  on or after [ the effective date of this 2022 Act] June 3,
2022.
(4) Section 10 , chapter 82, Oregon  Laws 2022, [of this 2022 Act ] applies to tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2026.
(5) Sections 13 and 15 , chapter 82, Oregon Laws  2022, [ of this 2022 Act ] apply to tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before  January 1, 2029, and to any tax year to which a
net operating loss arising in those tax years is carried back.
SECTION 6. ORS 315.283 applies to sales of publicly supported housing completed in tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.
SECTION 7.  ORS 315.283 is amended to read:
315.283. (1) A taxpayer  is allowed a credit against the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter
316 or, if the taxpayer  is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 for a qualifying sale in
Oregon of publicly supported housing during  the tax year. The amount of the credit allowed under
this section may not exceed:
(a) For housing owned by the taxpayer for at least five years,  2.5 percent of the lesser of the
housing’s sale price or the appraisal under ORS 315.286 (2)(e); or
(b) For housing owned by the taxpayer for at least 10 years, five percent of the lesser of  the
housing’s sale price or the appraisal under ORS 315.286 (2)(e).
(2) In order to claim a credit under this section, a taxpayer must:
(a) Lack identity of interest with the purchaser; and
(b) Receive certification of  a credit under ORS 315.286 (6) and submit the certification to the
Department of Revenue upon request of the department.
(3) The Department of Revenue may:
(a) Adopt rules for carrying out the provisions of this section; and
(b) Prescribe the form used to claim a credit under  this section and the information required
on the form.
(4) Any tax credit otherwise allowable under  this section that is not used by the taxpayer in a
particular tax year  may be carried forward and offset against the taxpayer’s tax liability for the
next succeeding tax year. Any credit remaining unused in the next succeeding tax year  may be
carried forward and used in  the second succeeding tax year, and likewise any credit not used in that
second succeeding tax year may be  carried forward and used in the third succeeding tax year, but
may not be carried forward for any tax year thereafter.
(5) In the case of a credit allowed under this section:
(a) A nonresident is allowed the credit under this section in the proportion provided  in ORS
316.117.
(b) If a change in the status of  a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonresident to
resident occurs, the credit allowed  by this section must be determined in a manner consistent with
ORS 316.117.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 2
(c) If a change in the  tax year of a taxpayer occurs as described in ORS 314.085, or if the De-
partment of  Revenue terminates the taxpayer’s tax year under ORS 314.440, the credit allowed under
this section must be prorated or computed in a manner consistent with ORS 314.085.
(6) The  Housing and Community Services Department shall provide information to the
Department of Revenue about all certifications issued under this section, if required as  pro-
vided by ORS 315.058.
SECTION 8. ORS 315.288 is repealed.
POLICY CHANGES
SECTION 9.  ORS 285B.627 is amended to read:
285B.627. (1) In consultation  with the Department of Revenue, the Oregon Business Development
Department shall establish and administer the Oregon Industrial Site Readiness Program. The pur-
pose of the program is to:
(a) Enter into tax reimbursement arrangements with qualified project sponsors  pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section; or
(b) Provide loans,  including forgivable loans, to qualified project sponsors pursuant to subsection
(5) of this section.
(2)(a) Subject to standards and procedures that the Oregon Business  Development Department
shall establish by rule, the department shall designate  regionally significant industrial sites for
inclusion in the program.
(b) A regionally  significant industrial site designated under this section must be an industrial
site that is planned and zoned for industrial use.
(3) A project sponsor may apply to participate in the program by submitting  an application and
development plan in writing in a form prescribed by the department by rule.
(4) The department shall establish by rule criteria and  standards for the qualification of project
sponsors to participate in the program.
[(5) Upon qualification of a project sponsor under this section, and before July 1, 2023, the  de-
partment may:]
(5) Upon qualification  of a project sponsor under this section, and before December 31,
2029, the department may:
(a) Enter  into a tax reimbursement arrangement with the project sponsor pursuant to which the
project sponsor shall receive an amount  equal to 50 percent of the estimated incremental income tax
revenues generated  by an eligible employer per tax year, beginning with the first tax year following
the tax year in which a project sponsor is qualified under this section, until the  total investment
of the qualified  project sponsor in the eligible site preparation costs, including interest, established
under subsection (7) of this section has been  recovered, at which time the tax reimbursement ar-
rangement shall end; or
(b) Enter into a  loan agreement with the project sponsor under terms and conditions specified
and required by the department. In  making a determination to enter into a loan agreement with the
project sponsor, the  department shall consider the reasonableness of the project sponsor’s estimated
costs to prepare the site for industrial use, including  but not limited to eligible site preparation
costs established by the  department pursuant to subsection (7) of this section. The agreement may
specify that a portion of the loan may  be forgiven if the project sponsor enters into a contract with
an eligible employer to conduct a business in the traded sector industry  on a regionally significant
industrial site within seven years after the project sponsor was qualified under this section.
(6)(a) The total amount of the loan that may be forgiven under  subsection (5) of this section is
the lesser of:
(A) Fifty percent of the total cost of eligible site preparation costs; or
(B) Fifty percent of the amount of the estimated incremental income tax revenues for the eligible
employer for the term of the loan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 3
(b) Loan forgiveness may  not be allowed under subsection (5) of this section if any portion of
the loan that would  not be forgiven would be repaid by the project sponsor with state funds received
from any source.
(7) The department  shall establish, by rule, eligible site preparation costs including, but not
limited to, some or all of the following:
(a) Acquisition and assembly costs associated with creating large development parcels.
(b) Transportation improvements such as access roads, intersections,  turning lanes, signals,
sidewalks, curbs, transit stops and storm drains.
(c) Water and sewer infrastructure.
(d) Natural resource mitigation.
(e) Site grading activities.
(f) Environmental remediation  and mitigation activities to address brownfields issues in accord-
ance with state and federally approved remediation plans.
(g) Planning, engineering and administrative costs associated with applying for necessary  local,
state and federal permits.
(h) Interest-carrying costs  incurred by a project sponsor for amounts borrowed to develop a re-
gionally significant industrial site, not to exceed 20 percent of the total amount forgiven, if  any,
under subsection (5) of this section.
(8) The total amount of tax reimbursement arrangements [ and loan amounts ] authorized  under
this section may not exceed $10 million per year.
(9) Funds received pursuant to a tax reimbursement arrangement or a  loan agreement under
subsection (5) of this section may not be used for the payment of:
(a) A penalty or fine; or
(b) Environmental remediation activities conducted at a regionally significant industrial  site
that is listed or proposed to be listed as a national priority pursuant to the Comprehensive Envi-
ronmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. 9605) for which  the project
sponsor, eligible employer or  any party to the tax reimbursement arrangement or loan agreement
is liable under 42 U.S.C. 9607 at that regionally significant industrial site.
(10) The department shall adopt  rules to administer and implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 285B.626 is amended to read:
285B.626. As used in ORS 285B.625 to 285B.632:
(1) “Eligible employer” means an employer that:
(a) Is conducting a traded sector business on a regionally significant industrial site; and
(b)(A) With  respect to the employer’s establishment at  a rural site, has [ hired at least 25
full-time employees whose wages average ] increased average annual employment by  at least 25
jobs and has an average annual wage of  at least 150 percent  of the county or state average wage,
whichever is less; or
(B) With respect to the employer’s establishment at  an urban site, has [ hired at least 50 full-
time employees whose wages average ] increased average annual employment by at least 50  jobs
and has an average annual wage of at least 150 percent of the county or state average  wage,
whichever is less.
(2) “Estimated incremental income tax revenues” means the Oregon personal income  tax re-
venues that are equivalent to the amount of tax that employees of an eligible employer who  are
hired by the eligible employer on a designated regionally significant industrial  site have paid under
ORS chapter 316 in the tax years following the first tax year in which the eligible employer  begins
conducting a traded sector business on the designated regionally significant industrial site.
(3) “Industrial use” means employment activities, including  but not limited to manufacturing,
assembly, fabrication, processing, storage, logistics, warehousing, importation, distribution,  trans-
shipment and research and development,  that generate income from the production, handling or
distribution of goods or services, including goods or services in the traded sector.
(4) “Project sponsor” means:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 4
(a) A public owner of a regionally significant industrial site that is investing in  preparation of
the site for industrial use by a third party; or
(b) A  public entity that has entered into a development or other agreement with the private
owner of a regionally significant industrial site to prepare the site for industrial use.
(5) “Regionally significant industrial  site” means a site planned and zoned for industrial use
that:
(a)(A) Is suitable for the location of new industrial uses or  the expansion of existing industrial
uses and that can provide significant additional employment in the region;
(B) Has site characteristics that provide significant competitive advantages that are  difficult or
impossible to replicate in the region; and
(C) Has superior access to transportation and freight infrastructure, including but  not limited
to rail, port, airport, multimodal freight or  transshipment facilities and other major transportation
facilities or routes; or
(b) Is located in an area designated by Metro, as defined in ORS 197.015, as a  regionally sig-
nificant industrial area.
(6) “Rural  site” means a regionally significant industrial site located in an area outside of a
metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the most recent federal decennial census.
(7) “Traded sector” has the meaning given that term in ORS 285A.010.
(8) “Urban site” means a regionally significant  industrial site located in a metropolitan statis-
tical area, as defined by the most recent federal  decennial census, that is located inside a regional
or metropolitan urban growth boundary.
(9) “Wage” has the meaning given that term pursuant to rules adopted by the  Oregon Business
Development  Department.
PROPERTY TAX CHANGES
SECTION 11.
ORS 307.157 is repealed.
SECTION 12. ORS 311.702, 311.704, 311.706, 311.708, 311.711, 311.716,  311.718, 311.721,
311.722, 311.723, 311.725, 311.727, 311.729, 311.730, 311.731, 311.732 and 311.735 are repealed.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding the repeal of ORS 311.702,  311.704, 311.706, 311.708, 311.711,
311.716, 311.718, 311.721, 311.722, 311.723, 311.725, 311.727, 311.729, 311.730,  311.731, 311.732 and
311.735 by section 12 of this 2024 Act, all  balances deferred under ORS 311.702 to 311.735 that
remain outstanding on the  effective date of this 2024 Act shall remain due and payable and
subject to collection and foreclosure under the provisions of ORS  311.702 to 311.735 as in ef-
fect immediately before the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14.  ORS 307.555 is amended to read:
307.555. (1) As used in this section and ORS 307.558:
(a) “Affordable housing covenant” and “eligible covenant  holder” have the meanings given those
terms under ORS 456.270.
(b) “Condominium unit” or “unit” has the meaning given that term under ORS 100.005.
(c) [ “Permanent” ] “Long-term”  means for a period of not less than 99 years.
(2) Upon compliance  with ORS 307.162, land owned by an eligible covenant holder that is bur-
dened by an affordable housing covenant requiring [ permanent] long-term affordability is  exempt
from ad valorem property taxation if, for any property tax year:
(a) The improvements on the land constitute owner-occupied housing;
(b) Owner-occupied housing is being constructed or rehabilitated on the land for  a reasonable
period;
(c) The land is being held for a  reasonable period for the construction of owner-occupied hous-
ing;
(d) The owner-occupied housing on the  land is unoccupied while offered for sale as owner-
occupied housing; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 5
(e) The owner is required to be absent from  the owner-occupied housing on the land by reason
of health or active military service.
(3)(a) Upon compliance with ORS 307.162, 27 percent of the assessed value of an  owner-occupied
condominium unit burdened by an  affordable housing covenant requiring [ permanent] long-term
affordability is exempt from ad valorem property taxation.
(b) An owner-occupied condominium unit that otherwise  remains eligible shall continue to re-
ceive the partial property tax exemption granted under this subsection if, for any property tax year:
(A) The unit is being rehabilitated for a reasonable period and will constitute  owner-occupied
housing after the rehabilitation is complete;
(B) The unit is unoccupied while offered for sale as owner-occupied housing; or
(C) The owner is required to be absent from the unit  by reason of health or active military
service.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, for purposes of subsections (2)(b)
and (c) and (3)(b)(A) of this section, “reasonable period” means a period not exceeding seven years.
(b) If, before the end of the sixth  consecutive property tax year for which land or an owner-
occupied condominium unit is granted an exemption  or partial exemption in the circumstances de-
scribed in subsection (2)(b) or  (c) or (3)(b)(A) of this section, the eligible covenant holder or owner
believes that the construction, rehabilitation or holding  period, as applicable, will continue past the
end of the next following property tax year, the eligible covenant holder or  owner may claim a
three-year extension by filing a notice of extension with the county assessor.
(c) The  extension becomes effective if the notice of extension is filed on or before April 1 pre-
ceding the first property tax year for which  the extension is claimed and is accompanied by a filing
fee equal to the greater of $200 or one-tenth of one percent of the real market value of the  land or
the owner-occupied condominium unit as of the most recent assessment date.
(5) Each year that a  parcel of land or an owner-occupied condominium unit is granted exemption
or partial exemption under this section, the county assessor shall enter on the  assessment and tax
roll that the property is exempt or partially exempt and is subject to potential additional taxes  as
provided under ORS 307.558 by adding the notation “potential additional taxes.”
(6) ORS 315.037 does not apply to this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 307.627 is amended to read:
307.627. (1) If, after application has been approved under  ORS 307.600 to 307.637, a declaration
defined in ORS 100.005 with respect to the property is presented to the  county assessor or tax col-
lector for approval under ORS 100.110,  or if the county assessor discovers that the multiple-unit
housing or a portion of the multiple-unit housing is changed  to a use that is other than residential
or housing, or if the exemption was granted for housing being or becoming subject  to a low income
housing assistance contract with an agency or subdivision of this state or the United States  and the
housing is  not housing subject to a low income housing assistance contract as of a date the housing
is required to be subject to  a low income housing assistance contract in order to receive the ex-
emption:
(a) The exemption  granted the multiple-unit housing or portion under ORS 307.600 to 307.637
shall terminate immediately, without right of notice or appeal;
(b) The property or  portion shall be assessed and taxed as other property similarly situated is
assessed and taxed; and
(c)(A) Notwithstanding ORS 311.235, there  shall be added to the general property tax roll for the
tax year next following  the presentation or discovery, to be collected and distributed in the same
manner as other real property tax,  an amount equal to the difference between the amount of tax
that would have been due on the property or portion had it not been exempt under ORS  307.600 to
307.637 for each of the years, not to exceed the last 10  years, during which the property was exempt
from taxation under ORS 307.600 to 307.637.
(B) In the  case of multiple-unit housing described in ORS 307.603 (5)(a), this paragraph applies
only if the low income housing assistance  contract to which the housing was or was to become
subject was not entered into, was breached or was terminated prematurely.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 6
(2) If, at the time of presentation or discovery, the property is no longer exempt, additional taxes
shall be  imposed as provided in this section, but the number of years that would otherwise be used
to compute the additional taxes shall be reduced one year for each year that has  elapsed since the
year the property was last granted exemption beginning with the  oldest year for which additional
taxes are due.
(3) The assessment and tax rolls shall show “potential additional tax liability” for  each property
granted exemption under ORS 307.600 to 307.637.
(4) Additional taxes collected under this section shall be deemed to have been  imposed in the
year to which the additional taxes relate.
SECTION 16. ORS 308.408, 308.411, 308.412 and 308.413 are added  to and made a part of
ORS 308.408 to 308.413.
SECTION 17.  ORS 311.990 is amended to read:
311.990. (1) Violation of ORS 311.270 is a Class B violation.
(2) Violation of ORS 311.350 is a Class B misdemeanor.
(3) Violation of ORS 311.425 (1) is a Class A violation.
(4) If a tax collector fails to  comply with any of the provisions of law relating to the receiving
and receipting of moneys and  warrants collected by the tax collector for taxes, the tax collector
commits a Class A violation. The court before whom the tax collector is tried shall declare the office
of the tax collector vacant for the remainder of the tax collector’s  term [ of the tax collector ].
(5) If a tax collector willfully returns as unpaid any tax [ which] that has been paid to the  tax
collector, the tax collector commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(6) If a tax collector or sheriff neglects or refuses to pay over to the county  treasurer  all
moneys collected for taxes  by  the tax collector or sheriff [ for taxes to the county treasurer ], or
neglects or refuses to make a return of delinquent taxes of  the county, or any other return or
statement, as required by the laws relating  to the collection of property taxes, the tax collector or
sheriff commits a Class C felony.
(7) A person who knowingly makes a [ false oath ] statement that is untrue with respect to  a
claim under ORS 311.666 to 311.701  commits [ perjury] the crime of false swearing  and shall be
punished as provided by ORS [ 162.085] 162.075.
SECTION 18.
The amendments to ORS 311.990 by section 17 of this 2024 Act apply to
statements made on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 19.  ORS 307.651 is amended to read:
307.651. As used in ORS 307.651 to 307.687, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Governing body” means the  city legislative body having jurisdiction over the property for
which an exemption may be applied for under ORS 307.651 to 307.687.
(2) “Manufactured home” means a structure that complies with any or  all of the follow-
ing placement standards, or any less restrictive standard,  for the approval of manufactured
homes located outside mobile home parks:
(a) The structure shall  be multisectional and enclose a space of not less than 1,000 square
feet.
(b) The structure shall be placed on an excavated and back-filled foundation and  enclosed
at the perimeter such that the structure is located not more than 12 inches above grade.
(c) The structure shall have a pitched roof.
(d) The structure shall have exterior siding and roofing which  in color, material and ap-
pearance is similar to the exterior siding and roofing  material commonly used on residential
dwellings within the community or which is  comparable to the predominant materials used
on surrounding dwellings as determined by the local permit approval authority.
(e) The structure shall be  certified by the manufacturer to have an exterior thermal
envelope meeting performance  standards that reduce levels equivalent to the performance
standards required of single-family dwellings constructed  under the state building code as
defined in ORS 455.010.
(f) The structure shall have a garage or carport constructed of like materials.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 7
[(2)] (3) “Qualified dwelling unit” means a dwelling unit that, at the time  an application is filed
pursuant to ORS 307.667, has a market value for the land and improvements of  no more than 120
percent, or a lesser percentage as adopted by the  governing body by resolution, of the median sales
price of dwelling units located within the city.
[(3)] (4) “Single-unit housing” means a structure having one or more dwelling units that:
(a) Is, or will  be, upon purchase, rehabilitation or completion of construction, in conformance
with all local plans and planning regulations, including special or district-wide plans developed  and
adopted pursuant to ORS chapters 195, 196, 197, 197A and 227.
(b) If newly constructed, is completed  within two years after application for exemption is ap-
proved under ORS 307.674.
(c) Is designed for each dwelling unit within  the structure to be purchased by and lived in by
one person or one family.
(d) Has one or more qualified dwelling units within the single-unit housing.
(e) Is not a floating home, as defined in ORS 830.700, or  a manufactured structure, other than
a manufactured home [ described in ORS 197.307 (8)(a) to (f) (2021 Edition) ].
[(4)] (5) “Structure” does not include the  land or any site development made to the land, as
those terms are defined in ORS 307.010.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 307.677 is amended to read:
307.677. Notwithstanding ORS 307.651 to 307.687:
(1) If the city finds  that construction of single-unit housing was not completed in accordance
with ORS 307.651 [ (3)(b)] (4)(b), the city may extend the deadline for completion  of construction for
a period not to exceed an additional 24 consecutive months if the city further finds that:
(a) The failure  to complete construction was due to circumstances beyond the control of the
owner; and
(b) The owner had been acting and could reasonably be  expected to act in good faith and with
due diligence.
(2) If property granted  exemption under ORS 307.651 to 307.687 is destroyed by fire or act of
God, or is otherwise no longer capable of occupancy due to circumstances beyond the control  of the
owner, the exemption shall cease but no  additional taxes or penalty shall be imposed under ORS
307.651 to 307.687 upon the property.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 305.140 is amended to read:
305.140. (1) Any person having  an interest in or lien upon any real property may request the
Department of Revenue in writing to release such real property from a cloud on the title of  or lien
on such property existing, created or continued under any one or more of the following:
(a) A warrant provided for in ORS 314.430, 321.570, 323.610 or 475C.688; or
(b) The provisions of ORS 311.673, 311.679, 311.689[ , 311.711] or 311.771.
(2) If, upon a request under subsection (1) of this section, the department finds that a  sale of
such real  property would not result in satisfaction in whole or in part of the taxes due, it shall ex-
ecute a release of such cloud or lien  upon such property, and such release shall be conclusive evi-
dence of the removal and extinguishment of such cloud or lien in respect of such real property.
(3) In addition to the release of cloud or lien provided for in subsection  (1) of this section, the
department may execute releases on part or all of any real property in the  following cases, which
releases shall be conclusive evidence of the removal and extinguishment of such cloud or lien:
(a) If the department finds that liability for the amount assessed, together with  all interest
thereon and penalties and costs in respect thereof, has been satisfied;
(b) If the department finds that the fair market value of that part of the property  remaining
subject to the cloud or lien is at least double the amount of the liability remaining  unsatisfied in
respect of such tax and the amount of all prior liens upon the property;
(c) If there is supplied to the  department either an irrevocable letter of credit issued by an in-
sured institution as defined in ORS 706.008 or a bond, in such form and  with such surety as the
department considers sufficient, conditioned upon  the payment of the amount of the warrant, to-
gether with all interest in respect thereof, within 60 days after the issuance of the release; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 8
(d) If there is paid to  the department in partial satisfaction of the amount of the warrant pro-
vided for in ORS 314.430,  321.570, 323.610 or 475C.688 or the amount of any lien under ORS 311.673,
311.679, 311.689[, 311.711] or 311.771, an  amount not less than the value, as determined by the de-
partment, of the lien of the State of  Oregon upon the part of the property so to be released. In de-
termining such value the department shall give consideration to the fair market  value of the part
of the property so to be released and to such liens thereon as have priority to the  lien of the State
of Oregon.
SECTION 22.  ORS 311.701 is amended to read:
311.701. (1) There is established in the State Treasury the [ Senior] Homestead Property Tax
Deferral Revolving Account to be used by the Department of Revenue for  the purpose of making the
payments to:
(a) County tax collectors of  property taxes deferred for tax years beginning on or after January
1, 1983, as required by ORS 311.676.
[(b) The appropriate local officer of special assessment improvement amounts deferred on or after
October 15, 1983, as required by ORS 311.730. ]
[(c)] (b) The department for its expenses in administering the [ property tax and special  assess-
ment senior deferral programs ] homestead property tax  deferral program under ORS 311.666 to
311.701.
(2) The [ Senior] Homestead Property Tax Deferral Revolving Account may include a reserve for
payment of department administrative expenses.
(3) All sums of money received by the Department of Revenue under ORS 311.666 to  311.701 as
repayments of deferred property taxes [ or under ORS 311.702 to 311.735 as repayments of deferred
special assessment improvement amounts ], including the interest accrued under ORS 311.674 (3)  [ or
311.711 (3)] shall, upon receipt, be credited to the revolving account and are continuously appropri-
ated to the department for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
(4)(a) If there are not sufficient moneys in the revolving account to make the payments required
by subsection (1) of this section, and the amount appropriated from  the General Fund is not suffi-
cient when added together with the moneys  in the revolving account to provide an amount sufficient
to make the required payments, the State Treasurer, in the capacity of investment  officer for the
Oregon Investment Council, may lend to the Department of Revenue such amounts as may be nec-
essary to make the payments.
(b) The State Treasurer may lend moneys that may be invested as  provided in ORS 293.701 to
293.857.
(c) Any moneys lent under this subsection shall be repaid  within five years together with in-
terest at a rate determined by the State Treasurer and consistent with the investment standards  of
ORS 293.721 and 293.726.
SECTION 22a.
The amendments to ORS 311.701 by section 22 of  this 2024 Act become
operative on July 1, 2034.
SECTION 23.  ORS 311.795 is amended to read:
311.795. (1) A county governing body may cancel all delinquent taxes and  the interest and pen-
alties thereon accrued upon  property donated to any incorporated city or town or any park and
recreation district organized and operating under ORS chapter 266 for parks, playgrounds or a  city
hall. This section does not apply if  the city, town or park and recreation district makes any payment
to the owner, either directly or indirectly, for the property.
(2) A county governing  body may cancel all delinquent real property taxes and interest and
penalties due thereon from any taxpayer where the total of the  same is $10 or less, when in the
judgment of the county governing body  the cost of collecting the same will be greater than the
amount to be collected.
(3) A county governing body may cancel all  delinquent personal property taxes and the interest
and penalties thereon due from any taxpayer where the total of the same is  $10 or less and in the
judgment of the county governing body  the cost of collecting the same will be greater than the
amount to be collected.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 9
(4) Property taxes that are deferred under the homestead  property tax  deferral program estab-
lished under ORS 311.666 to  311.701[, special assessments for local improvements that are deferred
under ORS 311.702 to 311.735 ] or property taxes that are deferred  under the disaster area tax
deferral program established under ORS 311.740 to 311.780 are not delinquent taxes for purposes of
this section. A county governing body may not cancel any deferred taxes[ , deferred  special assess-
ments] or interest or penalties that accrue with respect to deferred taxes [ or deferred special as-
sessments] described in this subsection.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 285C.100 is amended to read:
285C.100. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 285C.095, a city shall  be designated for electronic commerce
if the city:
(a) By resolution of the governing body of the city, declares itself  a city designated for elec-
tronic commerce;
(b) As of January 1, 2002, has a population of more than 1,500 but less than 2,000;
(c) Is located less than 25 miles from a city with a population of more than 500,000; and
(d) Is located less than 10 miles from a city with a high concentration of high technology firms
and with a population that, as of January 1, 2002, does not exceed 85,000.
(2) Only one city may be designated for electronic  commerce under this section, and that des-
ignation shall be made without consideration of the numeric limits imposed by ORS 285C.095.
(3)(a) A city does not need to sponsor an enterprise zone  to be designated for electronic com-
merce under this section.
(b) The governing body of a city designated for electronic commerce under this section does not
need to comply with the requirements of ORS 285C.067 or 285C.090, but the governing body must
take all actions that are required of  a sponsor of a rural enterprise zone under ORS 285C.050 to
285C.250 with respect to business firms seeking exemption under ORS 285C.175.
(c) A business firm that is engaged in electronic commerce or semiconductor-related  devel-
opment activities at a location inside  a city designated for electronic commerce under this section
and that seeks an exemption under ORS 285C.175 must take all actions required of a qualified
business firm under ORS 285C.050 to 285C.250, except that the business firm does  not need to be
located within an enterprise zone.
(d) A business firm described in paragraph (c) of this subsection:
(A) Shall be an eligible business firm, the qualified property  of which is exempt from taxation
under ORS 285C.175 as if the qualified property  were located in an enterprise zone under ORS
285C.095, or  if the qualified property is used in semiconductor-related development
activities; and
(B) May claim the tax credit under ORS 315.507.
(4) Designation of a city for electronic commerce under this section is not final until  a positive
determination in favor of the city has been made by the Oregon Business  Development Department
under ORS 285C.102.
(5) For the purpose of determining the boundaries of a  city designated for electronic commerce,
“city”  includes:
(a) Territory that is annexed into the city, as of the date of the annexation;
(b) Land within the urban growth boundary of the city; and
(c) Territory that is added to the urban growth boundary described in paragraph (b) of  this
subsection, as of the date the urban growth boundary is extended to such territory.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 285C.185 is amended to read:
285C.185. (1) In order for property to be qualified property under  ORS 285C.180, the property
must cost:
(a) $50,000 or more, in the case of:
(A) All real property that is concurrently exempt at the location; or
(B) An item of personal property that is not described in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) $1,000 or more, in the case of an item of personal property that is used:
(A) Exclusively in the production of tangible goods; [ or]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 10
(B) In electronic commerce in an enterprise zone approved for  electronic commerce designation
under ORS 285C.095 ; or
(C) In semiconductor-related development activities in a city designated for electronic
commerce.
(2) The estimated cost of property set  forth in an application for authorization under ORS
285C.140 shall be disregarded for purposes of determining if property is qualified property.
(3) Property that  is leased by the authorized business firm may be qualified property under ORS
285C.180 only if the terms of the lease provide:
(a) During the term of the lease, that the authorized business firm is  to compensate the owner
of the leased property for all property taxes assessed  against the leased property or that the firm
is to pay these taxes; and
(b) That the term of the lease begins on or before the start of the first tax  year for which the
property is exempt and ends on or after the last day of  the last tax year for which the property is
exempt.
(4) In  order for property that is owned or leased by an authorized business firm operating a
hotel, motel or  destination resort to be qualified property under ORS 285C.180, the property must
be:
(a) Located and in service in an enterprise zone of a sponsor or  in the jurisdiction of a re-
stricted city or county cosponsor that has elected  under ORS 285C.070 to treat a business firm en-
gaged in hotel, motel or destination resort operations as an eligible business firm;
(b) Located at the same site as the hotel, motel or destination resort  or in close proximity to
that site; and
(c) Used primarily to  serve overnight guests of the hotel, motel or destination resort. Property
is used primarily to serve overnight guests if at least 50  percent of any receipts from use of the
property are paid by overnight guests.
(5) In order for property owned  or leased and operated by a business firm engaged in electronic
commerce or in semiconductor-related development  activities in a city designated for electronic
commerce under ORS 285C.100 to be qualified property, the property otherwise qualified under this
section and the applicable electronic commerce operations  or semiconductor-related development
activities of the firm must be located in that city.
(6)(a) As used in  this section, “item of personal property” includes an integrated system con-
sisting of various components.
(b) Consistent with paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Department of Revenue  may by rule
further define what constitutes an item of personal property for purposes of this section.
SECTION 26.
The amendments to ORS 285C.100 and 285C.185 by sections 24 and 25 of  this
2024 Act apply to property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 26a.  ORS 307.181 is amended to read:
307.181. (1)(a)  Land acquired by an Indian tribe by purchase, gift or without consideration is
exempt from taxation if:
(A) The land is located within the ancient tribal boundaries of the tribe; and
(B) Acquisition of the land by the United States in trust status has been  requested or is in
process.
(b) The exemption granted under this subsection ceases if the federal  government enters a final
administrative determination denying the request for acquisition of the land in trust status and:
(A) The deadlines  for all available federal administrative appeals and federal judicial review
expire with no appeal or review initiated; or
(B) All federal  administrative and judicial proceedings arising from or related to the request for
or process of acquisition of the land  in trust status that have been initiated are completed without
overturning the administrative denial of the request.
(2)(a) Regardless of ownership, permanent improvements are exempt from state and  local prop-
erty taxes and fees, charges and  assessments related to property taxation if the improvements are
located on land that is owned by the United States and held in trust pursuant to federal law for:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 11
(A) A federally recognized Indian tribe; or
(B) An individual member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection,  the exemption granted under
paragraph (a) of  this subsection does not apply to property assessable  under ORS 308.505 to
308.674.
(c) Regardless of ownership, permanent improvements that would otherwise  be
assessable under ORS 308.505 to 308.674 are  exempt from state and local property taxes and
fees, charges and assessments related to property taxation if the permanent improvements:
(A) Are located on land that is:
(i) Owned by the United States and held in trust pursuant to federal law for a federally
recognized Indian tribe in Oregon; and
(ii) Within Jefferson County or Wasco County;
(B) Consist of solar energy systems for the purpose of heating,  cooling or generating
electricity; and
(C) Are subject to a property tax program imposed by the tribe.
(d) Upon request, and pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement between the  tribe
and the governing body of any county in which a portion of the permanent  improvements is
located, the county assessor  shall provide such information as is necessary for the tribe to
assess, impose and collect the tribal property taxes on the permanent improvements  de-
scribed in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) Property granted exemption under paragraph (c) of this subsection is  not centrally
assessed for purposes of ORS 307.330.
(f) ORS 315.037 does not apply to the exemption granted  under paragraph (c) of this
subsection.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding  subsection (1) of this section, property that is owned exclusively by an
eligible  Indian  tribe or by an entity wholly owned by an eligible Indian tribe, or a portion of the
property,  is  exempt from taxation if the property, or the portion of the property, respectively, is used
exclusively for government services.
(b) Property described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection that may be exempt from taxation as
property used exclusively for low income rental housing includes, without limitation, property that:
(A) Is held under lease or a lease purchase agreement by an eligible Indian tribe;
(B)(i) Is the  property of a partnership, nonprofit corporation or limited liability company of
which an eligible Indian tribe is a general partner, limited partner, director, member, manager or
general manager; and
(ii) Is leased or rented to low income persons for housing purposes; or
(C) Is used  exclusively for an activity that qualifies as an affordable housing activity under 25
U.S.C. 4132.
(c) Property described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection may not be exempt from taxation as
property that is used exclusively for low income rental housing unless:
(A) All agreements necessary for the construction and operation of the property as  low income
rental housing are executed before July 1, 2017;
(B) For purposes of ORS  307.540 to 307.548, the requirements of ORS 307.543 have been satisfied;
(C) The property is offered for rent or is held for the purpose of developing  low income rental
housing;
(D) If occupied, the property is occupied solely by low income persons; and
(E) The property is located in a county in which more than 10  percent of the enrolled members
of the eligible Indian tribe reside.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible Indian tribe” means the Burns  Paiute Tribe, the Confederated Tribes of Coos,
Lower Umpqua and Siuslaw Indians, the Confederated Tribes of the  Grand Ronde Community of
Oregon, the Confederated Tribes of Siletz Indians of Oregon,  the Confederated Tribes of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 12
Umatilla Indian  Reservation, the Confederated Tribes of Warm Springs Reservation of Oregon, the
Coquille Indian Tribe, the Cow Creek Band of Umpqua Tribe of Indians or the Klamath Tribes.
(b) “Government services” means services provided by an eligible Indian tribe that:
(A) Are equivalent to services that a state or  local government or the federal government cus-
tomarily provides to its citizens;
(B) Are related to:
(i) Tribal administration;
(ii) Tribal facilities or tribal health facilities;
(iii) Elementary or secondary education or higher education, including community colleges;
(iv) Transportation;
(v) Fire or police;
(vi) Low income rental housing;
(vii) Utility services provided to an Indian reservation or to land held in  trust by the United
States for the benefit of an eligible Indian tribe; or
(viii) Cemeteries; and
(C) Other than government services related to the uses  of property described in subsection (3)(c)
of this section, do not generate income.
(c) “Low income”:
(A) Means income at or below 60 percent  of the area median income as determined by the
Oregon  Housing  Stability Council based on information from the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(B) For purposes of projects undertaken pursuant to the Native American  Housing Assistance
and Self-Determination Act  of 1996 (P.L. 104-330), includes income that qualifies under 24 C.F.R.
5.609.
(d) “Permanent improvements” means “real property” as defined in ORS 307.010 (1)(b)(B).
(e) “Utility services” means services related to sanitation, sewer, storm drainage and water.
SECTION 26b.
The exemption granted under ORS 307.181 (2)(c) applies to:
(1) The first  solar energy system project completed on or after the effective date of this
2024 Act.
(2) Property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
ADMINISTRATIVE CHANGES
SECTION 27.  ORS 291.349 is amended to read:
291.349. (1) As soon as practicable after adjournment sine die of the  odd-numbered year regular
session of the Legislative Assembly, the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services shall report
to the Legislative Revenue Officer and the Legislative Fiscal Officer the estimate as  of July 1 of the
first year of the biennium of General Fund and State Lottery Fund  revenues that will be received
by the state  during that biennium. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall base its
estimate on  the last forecast given to the Legislative Assembly before adjournment sine die of the
odd-numbered year regular session on which the printed, adopted budget prepared in the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services is based, adjusted only insofar as necessary to reflect
changes in laws adopted at that session. The report shall  contain the estimated revenues from cor-
porate income and excise taxes separately from the estimated revenues from other  General Fund
sources. The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services may revise the estimate if necessary
following adjournment sine die of a special session or  an even-numbered year regular session of the
Legislative Assembly, but any revision does not affect the  basis of the computation described in
subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(2) As soon as practicable after the end of the  biennium, the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services shall report to the Legislative Revenue Officer  and the Legislative Fiscal Officer,
or the Legislative Assembly if it is in session, the amount of General Fund revenues  collected as
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 13
of the last June 30 of the preceding biennium. The report shall  contain the collections from corpo-
rate income and excise taxes separately from collections from other sources.
(3) If the revenues received from the corporate income and excise taxes  during the biennium
exceed the amounts estimated to be received from such  taxes for the biennium, as estimated after
adjournment sine die of the odd-numbered year regular session, by two percent  or more, the total
amount of  that excess shall be retained in the General Fund and used, in the manner described in
ORS 291.345, to provide additional funding for public education, kindergarten through grade 12.
(4) If the revenues received from General Fund  revenue sources, exclusive of those described in
subsection (3) of this section, during the biennium exceed  the amounts estimated to be received from
such sources for the biennium, as estimated after adjournment  sine die of the odd-numbered year
regular session, by two percent or more, there shall be credited to  personal income taxpayers an
amount equal to the total amount of that excess,  reduced by the cost certified by the Department
of Revenue under  ORS 291.351 as being allocable to credits described under this subsection. The
excess amount to be credited shall be credited to  personal income taxpayers in a percentage amount
of prior year personal income tax liability as determined under subsection (5) of this section.
(5)(a) If there is an excess to be  credited under subsection (4) of this section, on or before [ Oc-
tober] November 1, following the end of each biennium, the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services shall determine and certify to the Department of Revenue the  percentage amounts of credit
for purposes of subsection (4) of this section.  The percentage amounts determined shall be percent-
age amounts  to the nearest one-tenth of a percent that will distribute the excess to be credited to
personal income taxpayers.
(b) The percentage amount  applicable to subsection (4) of this section shall equal the amount
distributed under subsection (4) of this  section divided by the estimated total personal income tax
liability for all personal income taxpayers for tax years beginning in  the calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined.
(c) The amount of the surplus credit under subsection (4) of this section is determined  by
multiplying the percentage  amount determined under paragraph (b) of this subsection by the total
amount of a  personal income taxpayer’s tax liability for the tax year beginning in the calendar year
immediately preceding the calendar year in which the excess is determined in order  to calculate the
amount to be credited to the taxpayer.
(d) The credit  shall be determined based on the tax liability as shown on the return of the tax-
payer or as corrected by the Department of Revenue.
(e) The credit shall be computed after the allowance of a  credit provided under ORS 316.082,
316.131 or 316.292, but before the allowance of any other credit or offset against tax liability allowed
or allowable under  any provision of law of this state, and before the application of estimated tax
payments, withholding or other advance tax payments.
(f) For personal income taxpayers, if  a credit applied against tax liability as described in para-
graph (e) of this subsection reduces  tax liability to zero and an amount of the credit remains unused,
the remaining unused amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer. For purposes of ORS  chapters 305,
314, 315 and 316,  refunds issued under this paragraph are refunds of an overpayment of tax imposed
under ORS chapter 316.
(g) The Department of Revenue may prescribe by rule  the manner of calculating and claiming
a credit if the filing status of a taxpayer changes between the tax year for which a credit may be
claimed and the succeeding tax year.
(6) A refund may not be made under this section to  a taxpayer if the amount of the refund is
less than $1.
(7) Not later than [ October] November 15 following the end  of the biennium, the Department
of Revenue shall provide information and guidance to taxpayers relating to the calculation of the
credit.  The  department may make the information and guidance available electronically or other-
wise.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 14
(8) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules specifying the manner for  issuing refunds under
this section to taxpayers who filed returns for the tax  year on which the credit is computed but who
are not required to file returns for the year in which the credit could be claimed.
SECTION 28.  ORS 327.001 is amended to read:
327.001. (1) The Fund for Student Success is  established in the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Fund for Student Success shall consist of  moneys appropriated by the Legislative As-
sembly, moneys  transferred to the fund under ORS 317A.155 and moneys received as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf  of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources for the Fund  for Student Suc-
cess. Moneys received as provided in this subsection shall be deposited into  the Fund for Student
Success.
(4) Moneys  in the Fund for Student Success are continuously appropriated to the department for:
(a) Transfer for each biennium  to the State School Fund in the amount calculated by the [ Leg-
islative Fiscal Officer and the Legislative Revenue Officer ] division of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services that serves as office of economic analysis  to be the sum of:
(A) At least $40 million, for the purpose of a transfer  under ORS 327.008 (10) to the High Cost
Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348; and
(B) The amount of change in General Fund revenue to be  collected in the biennium due to the
amendments to ORS 316.037 by  section 56, chapter 122, Oregon Laws 2019, and the operation of ORS
317A.100 to 317A.158.
(b) Retention as a reserve for cash flow and revenue shortfall purposes.
(c) Of the amount in the Fund for Student Success that is not dedicated for  transfer as pre-
scribed by paragraph (a) of this subsection or retained under paragraph (b)  of this subsection,
transfer to other education accounts as follows:
(A) At least 50 percent to the Student Investment Account established in ORS 327.175.
(B) Up to 30 percent to the Statewide Education Initiatives Account established in ORS  327.250.
(C) At least 20 percent to the Early Learning Account established in ORS 327.269.
(5) The department shall make the  transfers prescribed by subsection (4) of this section on a
periodic basis. The transfers must be in amounts that, based on the  most recent data available to
the department, ensure that the amounts and percentages identified in subsection  (4) of this section
are satisfied by the end of the biennium.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 34.030 is amended to read:
34.030. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,  the writ shall be allowed  by
the circuit court, or, in counties where the county court has  judicial functions, by the county court
wherein the  decision or determination sought to be reviewed was made, upon the petition of the
plaintiff, describing  the decision or determination with convenient certainty, and setting forth the
errors alleged to have been committed therein. The petition shall  be signed by the plaintiff or the
attorney of the plaintiff, and verified by the certificate of an attorney to the effect that  the attorney
has examined the process or proceeding, and the decision or determination therein, and that it is
erroneous as alleged in the petition. A writ shall not be allowed unless  the petition therefor is made
within 60 days from the date of the decision or determination sought to be reviewed.
(2) The regular division of the  Oregon Tax Court shall have jurisdiction in review pro-
ceedings in all cases within its jurisdiction as described in ORS 305.410.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 34.120 is amended to read:
34.120. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the circuit  court  or judge
[thereof] of the circuit court  of the county [ wherein] in which the defendant, if a  public officer or
body, exercises functions, or if a  private person or corporation, [ wherein] in which such person re-
sides or may be found, or such private corporation might be sued in  an action, shall have exclusive
jurisdiction of mandamus proceedings, including proceedings under ORS 215.429 and 227.179.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 15
(2) The regular  division of the Oregon Tax Court [ or judge thereof ] shall have jurisdiction in
mandamus proceedings in all cases [ involving tax laws ] within its jurisdiction as described in ORS
305.410, and the Supreme Court may take original jurisdiction in mandamus proceedings  as provided
in section 2 of amended Article VII of the Oregon Constitution.
SECTION 31.  ORS 305.245 is amended to read:
305.245. Notwithstanding ORS  8.690, 9.160, 9.320, ORS chapter 180, ORS 203.145 or other law,
in any conference or proceeding before a tax court magistrate with  respect to the administration
of any tax,  a [ county] local government or the Department of Revenue may be represented by any
officer or authorized employee of the [ county] local government or department.
SECTION 32.  ORS 305.275 is amended to read:
305.275. (1) Any person may appeal under this  subsection to the magistrate division of the
Oregon Tax Court as provided in ORS 305.280 and 305.560, if all of the following criteria are met:
(a) The person must be aggrieved by and affected by an act, omission,  order or determination
of:
(A) The Department of Revenue in its administration of the revenue and tax laws of this state;
(B) A county property value appeals board other than an order of the board;
(C) A county assessor or  other county official, including but not limited to the denial of a claim
for exemption, the denial of special assessment under a special assessment  statute, or the denial of
a claim for cancellation of assessment;
(D) A tax collector; [ or]
(E) A local government in its  administration of a tax described in ORS 305.410 (3), if the person
first exhausts all administrative remedies provided before the local government ; or
(F) An independent appeals board of a  local government that consists of tax professionals
and excludes local government officials or employees .
(b) The act, omission, order or determination must affect the property  of the person making the
appeal or property for  which the person making the appeal holds an interest that obligates the
person to pay taxes  imposed on the property. As used in this paragraph, an interest that obligates
the person to pay taxes includes a contract, lease or other intervening instrumentality.
(c) There is no other statutory right of appeal for the grievance.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person having a statutory right of  appeal under
the revenue and tax laws of the  state may appeal to the tax court as provided in ORS 305.404 to
305.560.
(3) If a taxpayer may appeal to the property value appeals board under ORS 309.100, then  no
appeal may be allowed  under this section. The appeal under this section is from an order of the
board as a result of the appeal filed under ORS 309.100  or from an order of the board that certain
corrections, additions to or changes in the roll be made.
(4) A county assessor who is aggrieved by an order of the county property value appeals  board
may appeal from the order as provided in this section, ORS 305.280 and 305.560.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 305.275, as operative until July 1, 2024, is amended to read:
305.275. (1) Any person may appeal under this  subsection to the magistrate division of the
Oregon Tax Court as provided in ORS 305.280 and 305.560, if all of the following criteria are met:
(a) The person must be aggrieved by and affected by an act, omission,  order or determination
of:
(A) The Department of Revenue in its administration of the revenue and tax laws of this state;
(B) A county board of property tax appeals other than an order of the board;
(C) A county assessor or  other county official, including but not limited to the denial of a claim
for exemption, the denial of special assessment under a special assessment  statute, or the denial of
a claim for cancellation of assessment;
(D) A tax collector; [ or]
(E) A local government in its  administration of a tax described in ORS 305.410 (3), if the person
first exhausts all administrative remedies provided before the local government ; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 16
(F) An independent appeals board of a  local government that consists of tax professionals
and excludes local government officials or employees .
(b) The act, omission, order or determination must affect the property  of the person making the
appeal or property for  which the person making the appeal holds an interest that obligates the
person to pay taxes  imposed on the property. As used in this paragraph, an interest that obligates
the person to pay taxes includes a contract, lease or other intervening instrumentality.
(c) There is no other statutory right of appeal for the grievance.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, any person having a statutory right of  appeal under
the revenue and tax laws of the  state may appeal to the tax court as provided in ORS 305.404 to
305.560.
(3) If a taxpayer may appeal to  the board of property tax appeals under ORS 309.100, then no
appeal may be allowed  under this section. The appeal under this section is from an order of the
board as a result of the appeal filed under ORS 309.100  or from an order of the board that certain
corrections, additions to or changes in the roll be made.
(4) A county assessor who is aggrieved by an  order of the county board of property tax appeals
may appeal from the order as provided in this section, ORS 305.280 and 305.560.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 305.280 is amended to read:
305.280. (1) Except as otherwise provided in  this section, an appeal under ORS 305.275 (1) or (2)
shall be filed within 90 days after the act, omission, order or determination becomes actually known
to the  person, but in no event later than one year after the act or omission has occurred, or the
order or determination has been made. An appeal under ORS 308.505 to 308.674 shall be filed within
90 days after the date the order is issued under ORS  308.584 (3). An appeal from a supervisory order
or other order or determination of the Department of Revenue shall  be filed within 90 days after the
date a copy of the order or determination or notice of the order or determination  has been served
upon the appealing party by mail as provided in ORS 306.805.
(2) An appeal under ORS 323.416 or 323.623 or from any notice of assessment or refund denial
issued by the Department  of Revenue with respect to a tax imposed under ORS chapter 118, 308,
308A, 310, 314, 316, 317, 318, 321 or this chapter, or collected  pursuant to ORS 305.620, shall be filed
within 90 days after the date of the notice. An appeal from a proposed adjustment under  ORS
305.270 shall be filed within 90 days after the date the notice of adjustment is final.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,  an appeal from a notice of assessment of taxes
imposed under ORS chapter 314, 316, 317 or 318 may be filed within two years  after the date the
amount of tax, as shown on the notice and including appropriate penalties and interest, is paid.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or as specifically provided in ORS  chap-
ter 321, an appeal to the tax court  under ORS chapter 321 or from an order of a county property
value appeals board shall be filed within 30 days after the date of  the notice of the determination
made by the department or the date of mailing of the order, the date of publication of notice of the
order, the date the order is personally delivered to the  taxpayer or the date of mailing of the notice
of the order to the taxpayer, whichever is applicable.
(5) An appeal from a local government’s final administrative decision shall be  filed within
90 days after the date of the decision.
[(5)] (6) If the tax court denies an appeal made pursuant to this  section on the grounds that it
does not meet the requirements of this section or ORS 305.275 or  305.560, the tax court shall issue
a written decision rejecting the petition and shall set forth in the decision the  reasons the tax court
considered the appeal to be defective.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 305.280, as operative until July 1, 2024, is amended to read:
305.280. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appeal  under ORS 305.275 (1) or (2)
shall be filed within 90 days after the act, omission, order or determination becomes actually known
to the  person, but in no event later than one year after the act or omission has occurred, or the
order or determination has been made. An appeal under ORS 308.505 to 308.674 shall be filed within
90 days after the date the order is issued under ORS  308.584 (3). An appeal from a supervisory order
or other order or determination of the Department of Revenue shall  be filed within 90 days after the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 17
date a copy of the order or determination or notice of the order or determination  has been served
upon the appealing party by mail as provided in ORS 306.805.
(2) An appeal under ORS 323.416 or 323.623 or from any notice of assessment or refund denial
issued by the Department of Revenue with respect to a tax imposed under ORS  chapter 118, 308,
308A, 310, 314, 316, 317, 318, 321 or this chapter, or collected  pursuant to ORS 305.620, shall be filed
within 90  days after the date of the notice. An appeal from a proposed adjustment under ORS
305.270 shall be filed within 90 days after the date the notice of adjustment is final.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section,  an appeal from a notice of assessment of taxes
imposed under ORS chapter 314,  316, 317 or 318 may be filed within two years after the date the
amount of tax, as shown on the notice and including appropriate penalties and interest, is paid.
(4) Except  as provided in subsection (2) of this section or as specifically provided in ORS chap-
ter 321, an appeal to the tax court under ORS chapter 321 or  from an order of a county board of
property tax appeals shall be filed within 30 days after the date of  the notice of the determination
made by the department or the date of mailing of the order, the date of publication of notice of the
order, the date the order is personally delivered to the  taxpayer or the date of mailing of the notice
of the order to the taxpayer, whichever is applicable.
(5) An appeal from a local government’s final administrative decision shall be  filed within
90 days after the date of the decision.
[(5)] (6) If the tax court denies  an appeal made pursuant to this section on the grounds that it
does not meet the requirements of this  section or ORS 305.275 or 305.560, the tax court shall issue
a written decision rejecting the petition and shall set forth in the decision the  reasons the tax court
considered the appeal to be defective.
SECTION 36.  ORS 305.410 is amended to read:
305.410. (1) Subject only to the provisions of ORS 305.445 relating to judicial  review by the Su-
preme Court and to subsection (2) of this section, the tax court shall be the sole, exclusive  and final
judicial authority for the hearing and determination of  all questions of law and fact arising under
the tax laws of this state. For the purposes of  this section, and except to the extent that they pre-
clude the imposition of other taxes, the following are not tax laws of this state:
(a) ORS chapter 577 relating to Oregon Beef Council contributions.
(b) ORS 576.051 to 576.455 relating to commodity commission assessments.
(c) ORS chapter 477 relating to fire protection assessments.
(d) ORS chapters 731, 732, 733, 734, 737,  742, 743, 743A, 743B, 744, 746, 748 and 750 relating to
insurance company fees and taxes.
(e) ORS chapter 473 relating to liquor taxes.
(f) ORS chapter 825 relating to motor carrier taxes.
(g) ORS chapter 319 relating  to motor vehicle and aircraft fuel taxes and the road usage charges
imposed under ORS 319.885.
(h) The Oregon Vehicle Code relating to motor vehicle and motor vehicle  operators’ license fees
and ORS chapter 830 relating to boat licenses.
(i) ORS chapter 578 relating to Oregon Wheat Commission assessments.
(j) ORS chapter 462 relating to racing taxes.
(k) ORS chapter 657 relating to unemployment insurance taxes.
(L) ORS chapter 656 relating to workers’ compensation contributions, assessments or fees.
(m) ORS 311.420, 311.425, 311.455, 311.650, 311.655 and ORS chapter 312 relating to foreclosure
of real and personal property tax liens.
(n) ORS 409.800 to 409.816 and 409.900 relating to long term care facility assessments.
(o) ORS chapter 657B relating  to family and medical leave insurance benefits and contributions.
(2) The tax court and the circuit courts  shall have concurrent jurisdiction to try actions or suits
to determine:
(a) The priority of property tax liens in relation to other liens.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 18
(b) The validity of any deed, conveyance, transfer or assignment  of real or personal property
under ORS 95.060 and 95.070 (1983 Replacement  Part) or 95.200 to 95.310 where the Department of
Revenue has or claims a lien or other interest in the property.
(3) Subject only to the  provisions of ORS 305.445 relating to judicial review by the Supreme
Court, the tax court shall be the sole, exclusive and final judicial authority for the hearing and  de-
termination of all questions of law and fact arising under any tax law  of a local government that
is imposed upon or measured by net income  or taxes or fees that  are reported on the same re-
turn as a tax imposed on  or measured by net income . The tax court does not have jurisdiction
to review determinations of a local government relating  to the collection, enforcement, adminis-
tration or distribution of a tax described in this subsection.
(4)(a)(A) The regular division  of the tax court and the circuit courts shall have concur-
rent jurisdiction for the hearing and determination of all questions of  law and fact arising
under any tax law of a local government not described in subsection (3) of this section.
(B) For  purposes of this subsection, tax laws of a local government not described in
subsection (3) of this  section include, but are not limited to, taxes authorized by ORS chapter
221 and laws of a local government imposing a tax on  wages or net earnings from self-
employment, on the sale or use of goods or services or on the transfer of real property.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the tax court shall not  have juris-
diction to review determinations of a local government relating to the  collection, enforce-
ment, administration or distribution of a tax described in this subsection.
(c)(A) The presiding judge of a circuit court may order a case  described in paragraph (a)
of this subsection to be transferred to the judge of the tax court upon motion of any party
or on the court’s own motion and the judge of the tax court may order such  a case to be
transferred to a circuit court upon motion of any party or on the court’s own motion.
(B) Lack  of subject matter jurisdiction in the court transferring the case shall not be
grounds for dismissal in the other court.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the commencement  of an action in the magistrate
division of the tax court, or the transfer of a case to  the magistrate division, is not grounds
for dismissal and the judge of the tax court shall specially designate any such case  for
hearing in the regular division as provided in ORS 305.501 (1).
(e) For purposes of any limitation on the time for commencement  of an action described
in this subsection, the date of filing shall be the first date on which the  action is filed in a
circuit court or in either division of the tax court.
(f) Notwithstanding ORS  305.425 or other law, for actions described in this subsection,
only those remedies available in a circuit court shall be available in the  tax court, including
but not  limited to, writ of review or mandamus under ORS chapter 34 and declaratory judg-
ment under ORS chapter 28.
(g) Proceedings in the tax court under this subsection  shall be without a jury and appeal
from the tax court shall be to the Supreme Court under ORS 305.445.
[(4)] (5) Subject only to the provisions of ORS  305.445 relating to judicial review by the Supreme
Court, the tax court shall be the sole, exclusive and final judicial authority for the hearing and  de-
termination of all questions of law and fact  concerning the authorized uses of the proceeds of
bonded indebtedness described in Article XI, section 11 (11)(d), of the Oregon Constitution.
[(5)] (6) Except as permitted under Article VII (Amended), section 2, of  the Oregon Constitution,
this section and ORS  305.445, no person shall contest, in any action, suit or proceeding in the circuit
court or any other court, any matter within the jurisdiction of the tax court.
SECTION 37.
 ORS 305.501 is amended to read:
305.501. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2)  of this section, an appeal to the tax court shall
be heard by a tax court magistrate unless  specially designated by the tax court judge for hearing
in the regular division. In any matter arising under the property tax  laws and involving a county
or county assessor that is designated for hearing in the  regular division, the Department of Revenue
shall be substituted for the county as a party.  The plaintiff or petitioner in the appeal is not re-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 19
quired to pay any additional filing  fee if the proceeding is specially designated by the tax court
judge for hearing in the regular division.
(2) A party to  the appeal may request mediation, or the tax court on its own motion may assign
the matter to mediation. If the mediation does not result in an agreed settlement  within 60 days
after the end of the  mediation session, the appeal shall, absent a showing of good cause for a con-
tinuance, be assigned to a magistrate for hearing.
(3) The  tax court, with the assistance of the State Court Administrator, shall establish proce-
dures for magistrate division hearings and mediation.
(4)(a) Subject to the  rules of practice and procedure established by the tax court, a magistrate
is not bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of pro-
cedure, and may conduct the hearing  in any manner that will achieve substantial justice. A hearing
may be conducted in  person or by telephone. Magistrates may confer with each other in order to
reach a decision on any matter.
(b) All written magistrate decisions shall be mailed to the  parties to the appeal and to the De-
partment of Revenue  or, for decisions regarding a tax described in ORS 305.410 (3), to a local
government’s tax administrator,  within five days after the date of entry of the written decision.
(5)(a) Any party dissatisfied with a  written decision of a magistrate may appeal the decision to
the judge of the tax court by filing  a complaint in the regular division of the tax court within 60
days after the date of entry of the written decision.
(b) If a decision of a magistrate  involves any matter arising under the property tax laws and a
county was a party to the proceeding before the magistrate, the Department of  Revenue may file a
notice of appeal whether or not the department had intervened  in the proceeding before the
magistrate. In such cases, the  department shall appear before the tax court judge in any proceeding
on appeal.
(c) If a decision of a magistrate involves any matter arising  under the property tax laws and a
party other than a county appeals the decision to the tax court judge, the Department  of Revenue
shall be the defendant.
(d) Appeal to the judge of the tax court is the sole and exclusive remedy for review of  a written
decision of a magistrate.
(6) Appeal of a final decision of a magistrate  before the judge of the tax court shall be as pro-
vided in ORS 305.425 (1) and 305.570.
(7) If no appeal is taken to the tax court judge within  60 days, the decision of the magistrate
shall become  final. The tax court shall enter a judgment enforcing all final decisions of the
magistrate, which judgment shall be  binding upon all parties. ORS 305.440 (2) applies to the final
determination of any property tax matter.
SECTION 38.
 ORS 305.560 is amended to read:
305.560. (1)(a) Except for an order, or  portion thereof, denying the discretionary waiver of pen-
alty or interest by  the Department of Revenue[ ,] or, for a tax described in ORS 305.410 (3), by a
local government’s tax administrator,  an appeal under ORS 305.275 may be taken by filing a
complaint with the clerk of the Oregon Tax Court at its  principal office at Salem, Oregon, within
the time required under ORS 305.280.
(b) The clerk of the tax court shall serve copies of all complaints and petitions  on the depart-
ment, or,  if applicable, on a local government administering a tax described in ORS 305.410 (3).
Service upon the department or the local government shall be accomplished by the clerk of the  tax
court filing the  copy of the complaint with the Director of the Department of Revenue or the ad-
ministrator of the tax imposed by the  local government. Except as otherwise provided by law, other
service shall be accomplished as provided in the rules of practice and procedure  promulgated by the
tax court.
(c)(A) The complaint shall be entitled in the name of the person filing the same as plaintiff  and
the department, county, taxpayer or other person or entity as defendant.  If the complaint relates to
value of  property for ad valorem property tax purposes and the county has made the appraisal, the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 20
complaint  shall  be entitled in the name of the person filing the same as plaintiff and the county
assessor as defendant.
(B) If any, a copy of the order of the  department or property value appeals board shall be at-
tached to the complaint.
(2) The complaint  shall state the nature of the plaintiff’s interest, the facts showing how the
plaintiff is aggrieved and directly affected by the order, act,  omission or determination and the
grounds upon which the plaintiff contends the order, act, omission or determination should  be re-
versed or modified. A responsive pleading shall be required of the defendant.
(3) In any case in which the taxpayer is  not the appealing party, a copy of the complaint shall
be served upon the taxpayer by the appealing party by certified mail within  the period for filing an
appeal, and an affidavit showing such service shall be filed with the clerk of  the tax court. A copy
of the order of the department, if any, shall be attached to  the complaint. The taxpayer shall have
the right to appear and be heard.
(4)(a) At any time in the course of any appeal before the tax court, the department may  inter-
vene as a matter of right. A copy of any order or judgment issued by  the tax court in any case in
which the department is an intervenor shall be served upon  the department in the manner provided
in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(b) The tax court, in its  discretion, may permit other interested persons to intervene by filing
a complaint in such manner and under such conditions as the court may deem appropriate.
SECTION 39.  ORS 305.560, as operative until July 1, 2024, is amended to read:
305.560. (1)(a) Except for an order, or portion thereof,  denying the discretionary waiver of pen-
alty or interest by the Department of Revenue[ ,] or, for a tax described in ORS 305.410  (3), by a
local government’s tax administrator,  an appeal under ORS 305.275 may be taken  by filing a
complaint with the clerk of the Oregon  Tax Court at its principal office at Salem, Oregon, within
the time required under ORS 305.280.
(b) The clerk of  the tax court shall serve copies of all complaints and petitions on the depart-
ment, or, if applicable, on a local government administering a tax described in ORS 305.410  (3).
Service upon the department or the local government shall be accomplished by the clerk of the  tax
court filing the copy of the complaint with the Director of the Department of Revenue or  the ad-
ministrator of the tax imposed by the  local government. Except as otherwise provided by law, other
service shall be accomplished as provided in the rules of practice and procedure  promulgated by the
tax court.
(c)(A) The complaint shall be entitled in the name of the person filing the same as plaintiff  and
the department, county, taxpayer or other person or entity as defendant.  If the complaint relates to
value of property for ad valorem property tax purposes and the county has made the appraisal,  the
complaint shall be entitled in the name of the person filing the same as plaintiff and the  county
assessor as defendant.
(B) If any, a copy of the order of the department or board of property tax appeals shall be at-
tached to the complaint.
(2) The complaint shall state the nature of the plaintiff’s interest, the facts showing  how the
plaintiff is aggrieved and directly affected  by the order, act, omission or determination and the
grounds upon which  the plaintiff contends the order, act, omission or determination should be re-
versed or modified. A responsive pleading shall be required of the defendant.
(3) In any case in which the taxpayer is not the  appealing party, a copy of the complaint shall
be served upon the taxpayer by the appealing party by certified mail within  the period for filing an
appeal, and an affidavit showing such  service shall be filed with the clerk of the tax court. A copy
of the order of the department, if  any, shall be attached to the complaint. The taxpayer shall have
the right to appear and be heard.
(4)(a) At  any time in the course of any appeal before the tax court, the department may inter-
vene as a matter of right. A copy  of any order or judgment issued by the tax court in any case in
which the department is an intervenor shall be served upon  the department in the manner provided
in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 21
(b) The tax court, in its discretion, may permit other interested  persons to intervene by filing
a complaint in such manner and under such conditions as the court may deem appropriate.
SECTION 40.  ORS 305.570 is amended to read:
305.570. (1)(a) Any  person, including a county assessor , [ or] county tax collector  or, for a tax
described in ORS 305.410 (3), a local government’s tax administrator,  aggrieved  by and affected
by a written decision of a tax court magistrate  issued under ORS 305.501, or any person seeking a
remedy in the tax court provided by statute, other than as provided in ORS 305.275  (1), may appeal
to the regular  division of the Oregon Tax Court, and appeal shall be perfected in the manner pro-
vided in ORS 305.404 to 305.560.
(b) Except for an appeal brought by a county assessor , [ or] county tax collector  or , for a tax
described in ORS 305.410 (3), a local government’s tax administrator,  the order being appealed
under this subsection must affect the person or the property of the person  making the appeal or
property for which the person making the appeal holds an interest that obligates the person to  pay
taxes imposed on the property. As used in this paragraph, an interest that obligates the  person to
pay taxes includes a contract, lease or other intervening instrumentality.
(2) A taxpayer or political subdivision  affected by a determination of the Department of Revenue
authorized under ORS 305.620 may appeal to the tax court as provided in ORS 305.620.
UNIT CAPTIONS NOT PART OF LAW
SECTION 41. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 42. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1526 (SB 1526-A) Page 22